Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3113
Department of Health and Human Services created; divisions.

The Department of Health and Human Services is created. The department shall have five divisions to be known as (1) the Division of Behavioral Health, (2) the Division of Children and Family Services, (3) the Division of Disability and Aging, (4) the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care, and (5) the Division of Public Health.

Laws 2007, LB296, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB340, § 18;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 32.
July 18, 2026